fst/postpositions.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+PP
+Masc
+Fem
+Sg
+Pl
+Gen
+Erg
+Abl
+Dat
+Acc

LEXICON Root
का+PP+Gen+Masc+Sg:का #;
के+PP+Gen+Masc+Pl:के #;
की+PP+Gen+Fem+Sg:की #;
की+PP+Gen+Fem+Pl:की #;

को+PP+Dat:को #;
को+PP+Acc:को #;

ने+PP+Erg:ने #;

से+PP+Abl:से #;

में Postposition;
पर Postposition;
तक Postposition;

LEXICON Postposition
+PP:0 #;
